Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.070

Professional relationships and liabilities preserved.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be interpreted to abolish, repeal, modify, restrict, or limit the law now in effect in this state applicable to the professional relationship and liabilities between the person furnishing the professional services and the person receiving such professional service and the standards for professional conduct. Any director, officer, shareholder, agent, or employee of a corporation organized under this chapter shall remain personally and fully liable and accountable for any negligent or wrongful acts or misconduct committed by him or her or by any person under his or her direct supervision and control, while rendering professional services on behalf of the corporation to the person for whom such professional services were being rendered. The corporation shall be liable for any negligent or wrongful acts of misconduct committed by any of its directors, officers, shareholders, agents, or employees while they are engaged on behalf of the corporation, in the rendering of professional services.

[ 2011 c 336 s 502; 1969 c 122 s 7.]